Missouri, session 2026, SB1801.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 21, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 21.1080, to read as
follows:
21.1080. 1. No member of the house of representatives
shall be permitted to introduce more than five legislative
bills or joint resolutions during a regular session of the
general assembly.
2. No member of the senate shall be permitted to
introduce more than ten legislative bills or joint
resolutions during a regular session of the general assembly.
3. The provisions of this section may be waived by a
house of the general assembly to permit a member to
introduce a bill or joint resolution in excess of the limits
provided in subsections 1 and 2 of this section only upon
approval of such waiver by at least two-thirds of the
elected members of the house.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
the introduction of an appropriation bill.
✓